public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
ƚédreme/gH
ɉúguƚo/aJL
apròpieme/gH
asòlto/BI
avòko/aJL
bestémeme/gH
buƚo/aJL
defàmeme/gH
deskantono/aJL
deskonparso/BI
despétoƚeme/gH
dexbiro/aJL
dexgràdeme/gH
dispento/BI
estaxio/aJL
exónereme/gH
fratarníxeme/gH
frusto/aJL
inđonto/BI
inardàreme/gH
inbaluko/aJL
infaréteme/gH
ingrasio/aJL
inkanèleme/gH
inpacugo/aJL
inpeŧolàteme/gH
intítoleme/gH
intarŧèso/BI
intarmedo/aJL
istíseme/gH
kòspero/aJL
koɉónbareme/gH
konbaso/BI
kontèsto/aJL
korso/BI
kuadrídeme/gH
mànteđo/aJL
mòso/BI
malsèsteme/gH
nàuxeo/aJL
ofento/BI
pàceme/gH
parlo/aJL
períodeme/gH
pospòsto/BI
prevendo/aJL
ràntoleme/gH
raxo/BI
refifo/aJL
renpianto/BI
romatíđeme/gH
romatiđo/aJL
sòƚito/BI
sekuèstro/aJL
skàrmeme/gH
skanseƚo/aJL
skuèrso/BI
somejo/aJL
spalpédeme/gH
straintento/BI
stronŧo/aJL
tapéseme/gH
traxo/BI
vertiso/fJL
xbàreme/gH
xlanso/aJL
xmóntegeme/gH
Ànxoƚo/ZI	po:proper_noun
superior/DW	po:adjective po:noun
altro/BW	po:quantifier
sol/BW	po:preposition po:adjective po:adverb
nove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
úndexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trédexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
kuíndexe/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexsète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixsète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixisète/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexedòto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixedòto/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexenove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dexenòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixenove/%	po:numeral_cardenal
dixenòve/%	po:numeral_cardenal
trenta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧinkuanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sesanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
otanta/%	po:numeral_cardenal
ŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
doŧento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
tresento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
sinkuesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
setesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
novesento/%	po:numeral_cardenal
meƚion/T%	po:numeral_cardenal
meƚiardo/T%	po:numeral_cardenal
I/£Z	po:numeral_latin
V/£Z	po:numeral_latin
X/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XXX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
L/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
C/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
D/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
M/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
èko/TR	po:adverb po:interjection
pagòto/BI	po:adjective
àngoƚo/T	po:noun
índexe/UI	po:noun
xornaƚe/U	po:noun
sapin/T	po:noun
ŧopa/U	po:noun
antigo/BW	po:adjective
arđento/T	po:noun
armelinèr/NV	po:noun
armeƚinèr/NV	po:noun
arteluso/TI	po:noun
artiƚièr/U	po:noun
bekamòrto/TI	po:noun po:adjective
boskarol/BV	po:noun
bronsa/U	po:noun
brusko/BI	po:noun
caro/BW	po:noun po:adjective
copin/T	po:noun
dolŧo/BIW	po:adjective
dolso/BW	po:adjective
eskluxivo/BW	po:adjective
fàŧil/DW	po:adjective
fàsil/DW	po:adjective
fàsiƚe/DW	po:adjective
fastuko/TI	po:noun
faxolèr/BV	po:noun
feriàa/U	po:noun
fiapo/BI	po:adjective
fortemente/IX	po:adverb
frutarol/BV	po:noun
garduso/TI	po:noun
ingistara/U	po:noun
ɉerto/TI	po:adjective
judisio/T	po:noun
kaldo/BWI	po:adjective po:noun
karbonèr/BV	po:noun
karegeta/U	po:noun
kaxèr/TV	po:noun
kruko/TI	po:noun
kuèrkol/T	po:noun
kuartaròl/TV	po:noun
ƚama/U	po:noun
leđier/T	po:adjective
liberamente/IX	po:adverb
ƚiberamente/IX	po:adverb
ƚunato/TI	po:noun
mòbiƚe/T	po:noun
malamente/IX	po:adverb
maƚamente/IX	po:adverb
mapa/U	po:noun
mesajo/T	po:noun
molinèr/BV	po:noun
naranŧèr/BV	po:noun
niòra/U	po:noun
ordo/T	po:noun
pajusko/TI	po:noun
permanensa/U	po:noun
pianeta/T	po:noun
pomèr/BV	po:noun
posibilmente/IX	po:adverb
precixo/BW	po:adjective
primieramente/IX	po:adverb
radixa/UI	po:noun
raro/BW	po:adjective
regolar/UW	po:adjective
regoƚar/UW	po:adjective
salado/T	po:adjective po:noun
sanɉuto/TI	po:noun
sansèr/BV	po:noun
semantegamente/IX	po:adverb
sentategamente/IX	po:adverb
sienŧa/U	po:noun
soƚo/BW	po:adjective po:adverb
speŧièr/BV	po:noun
spigaso/TI	po:noun
spriŧo/TI	po:noun
spusoƚente/U	po:adjective
storegamente/IX	po:adverb
teoregamente/IX	po:adverb
ua/U	po:noun
último/BW	po:adjective po:noun
vispo/T	po:adjective
alŧana/U	po:noun
marinèr/BV	po:noun
antian/T	po:noun
bañarol/BV	po:noun
balkon/U	po:noun
selèr/BV	po:noun
fiƚexèƚo/T	po:noun
bibita/U	po:noun
biskasièr/BV	po:noun
bískolo/TW	po:noun
borsarol/BV	po:noun
pinèr/BV	po:noun
bragèr/BV	po:noun
broaco/T	po:noun
bruskinèr/BV	po:noun
bula/U	po:noun
kalamièr/BV	po:noun
kamixolin/T	po:noun
kanevèr/BV	po:noun
cigiñòla/U	po:noun
kartèr/BV	po:noun
kasoleto/T	po:noun
sentura/U	po:noun
serèr/BV	po:noun
ŧiŧa/U	po:noun
kodoñèr/BV	po:noun
kontadinaŧo/T	po:noun
kortelèr/BV	po:noun
kòta/U	po:noun
finto/W	po:adjective
desipamento/T	po:noun
despensa/U	po:noun
